Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 21 Medical Assistance — Prescription Drugs

40-21-1.
Prescription drug program.

The department of human services is hereby authorized and directed to amend its practices, procedures, regulations, and the Rhode Island state plan for medical assistance (Medicaid) pursuant to Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq., to modify the prescription drug program:

To establish a preferred drug list (PDL);

To enter into supplemental rebate, discount, or other agreements with pharmaceutical companies;

To negotiate either state-specific supplemental rebates or to participate in a multistate pooling, supplemental-rebate program.

Determinations of drugs included on the PDL will be made by the State Department of Human Services, and a listing of the drugs shall be maintained on a public website. In making these determinations, the department shall consider the recommendations of the Medicaid Pharmaceutical and Therapeutics Committee, whose membership shall include practicing pharmacists and physicians, faculty members of the University of Rhode Island’s College of Pharmacy, and consumers or consumer representatives. Drugs exempt from the PDL shall include: (i) Anti-retrovirals; and (ii) Organ transplant medications. Physicians will be informed about prior authorization procedures for medications not on the PDL, and seventy-two-hour (72) emergency supplies may be dispensed if authorizations cannot be obtained; and

To mandate the dispensing of generic-only drugs with the exception of limited-brand drug coverage for certain therapeutic classes as approved by the Department of Human Services to individuals eligible for medical assistance (Medicaid) under §§

40-8.4-4

,

42-12.3-4

and

42-12.3-15

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 546, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 17, §§ 2, 14; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 36.

40-21-2.
Fee-for-service program.

The Department of Human Services is hereby authorized and directed to amend its regulations and the Rhode Island State Plan for Medical Assistance (Medicaid) pursuant to Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq., to modify the fee-for-service program prescription drug reimbursement formula to establish a ceiling equivalent to the combination of the manufacturer’s wholesale acquisition cost and a dispensing fee of three dollars and forty cents ($3.40) for outpatient prescriptions and two dollars and eighty-five cents ($2.85) for long-term-care prescriptions.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 546, § 1.

40-21-3.
Preferred drug list.

If a patient’s healthcare provider prescribes a prescription drug that is not on the preferred drug list, the prescriber shall consult with the program to confirm that, in his or her reasonable professional judgment, the patient’s clinical condition is consistent with the criteria for approval of the nonpreferred drug. Such criteria shall include:

The preferred drug has been tried by the patient and has failed to produce the desired health outcomes;

The patient has tried the preferred drug and has experienced unacceptable side effects;

The patient has been stabilized on a nonpreferred drug and transition to the preferred drug would be medically contraindicated; or

Other clinical indications identified by the committee for the patient’s use of the nonpreferred drug, which shall include consideration of the medical needs of special populations, including children, elderly, chronically ill, persons with mental health conditions, and persons affected by HIV/AIDS.

In the event that the patient does not meet the criteria in subsection (a), the prescriber may provide additional information to the program to justify the use of a prescription drug that is not on the preferred drug list. The program shall provide a reasonable opportunity for a prescriber to reasonably present his or her justification of prior authorization. If, after consultation with the program, the prescriber, in his or her reasonable professional judgment, determines that the use of a prescription drug that is not on the preferred drug list is warranted, the prescriber’s determination shall be final.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 546, § 1.